District of Columbia statutes.
6-1109

Regulations.

The Mayor is authorized to issue such regulations as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out his duties under this subchapter.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-144, § 10, 25 DCR 6939
Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-185, § 2(m), 53 DCR 6712

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-1009.
1973 Ed., § 5-829.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-185 deleted the second sentence which had read as follows: “Such regulations shall be issued to take effect within 60 days from the effective date of this subchapter.”

Editor's Notes

Because of the codification of D.C. Law 5-69 as subchapter II of this chapter, and the designation of the preexisting text of Chapter 11 as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter,” where applicable, in this section.